Connecticut, session 2026, HB05546.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (f) of section 9-612 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (f) (1) As used in this subsection and subsections (g) and (h) of this
5 section:
6 (A) "Quasi-public agency" has the same meaning as provided in
7 section 1-120.
8 (B) "State agency" means any office, department, board, council,
9 commission, institution or other agency in the executive or legislative
10 branch of state government.
sHB5546 / File No. 551 1

sHB5546 File No. 551
11 (C) "State contract" means an agreement or contract with the state or
12 any state agency or any quasi-public agency, let through a procurement
13 process or otherwise, having a value of fifty thousand dollars or more,
14 or a combination or series of such agreements or contracts having a
15 value of one hundred thousand dollars or more in a calendar year, for
16 (i) the rendition of services, (ii) the furnishing of any goods, material,
17 supplies, equipment or any items of any kind, (iii) the construction,
18 alteration or repair of any public building or public work, (iv) the
19 acquisition, sale or lease of any land or building, (v) a licensing
20 arrangement, or (vi) a grant, loan or loan guarantee. "State contract"
21 does not include any agreement or contract with the state, any state
22 agency or any quasi-public agency that is exclusively federally funded,
23 an education loan, a loan to an individual for other than commercial
24 purposes or any agreement or contract between the state or any state
25 agency and the United States Department of the Navy or the United
26 States Department of Defense.
27 (D) "State contractor" means a person, business entity or nonprofit
28 organization that enters into a state contract. Such person, business
29 entity or nonprofit organization shall be deemed to be a state contractor
30 until December thirty-first of the year in which such contract terminates.
31 "State contractor" does not include a municipality, [or] any other
32 political subdivision of the state or any indigenous tribe of the state
33 recognized under subsection (b) of section 47-59a, including any entities
34 or associations duly created by the municipality, [or] political
35 subdivision or indigenous tribe exclusively amongst themselves to
36 further any purpose authorized by statute, [or] charter or tribal law, or
37 an employee in the executive or legislative branch of state government
38 or a quasi-public agency, whether in the classified or unclassified service
39 and full or part-time, and only in such person's capacity as a state or
40 quasi-public agency employee.
41 (E) "Prospective state contractor" means a person, business entity or
42 nonprofit organization that (i) submits a response to a state contract
43 solicitation by the state, a state agency or a quasi-public agency, or a
44 proposal in response to a request for proposals by the state, a state
sHB5546 / File No. 551 2

sHB5546 File No. 551
45 agency or a quasi-public agency, until the contract has been entered into,
46 or (ii) holds a valid prequalification certificate issued by the
47 Commissioner of Administrative Services under section 4a-100.
48 "Prospective state contractor" does not include a municipality, [or] any
49 other political subdivision of the state or any indigenous tribe of the
50 state recognized under subsection (b) of section 47-59a, including any
51 entities or associations duly created by the municipality, [or] political
52 subdivision or indigenous tribe exclusively amongst themselves to
53 further any purpose authorized by statute, [or] charter or tribal law, or
54 an employee in the executive or legislative branch of state government
55 or a quasi-public agency, whether in the classified or unclassified service
56 and full or part-time, and only in such person's capacity as a state or
57 quasi-public agency employee.
58 (F) "Principal of a state contractor or prospective state contractor"
59 means (i) any individual who is a member of the board of directors of,
60 or has an ownership interest of five per cent or more in, a state contractor
61 or prospective state contractor, which is a business entity, except for an
62 individual who is a member of the board of directors of a nonprofit
63 organization, (ii) an individual who is employed by a state contractor or
64 prospective state contractor, which is a business entity, as president,
65 treasurer or executive vice president, (iii) an individual who is the chief
66 executive officer of a state contractor or prospective state contractor,
67 which is not a business entity, or if a state contractor or prospective state
68 contractor has no such officer, then the officer who duly possesses
69 comparable powers and duties, (iv) an officer or an employee of any
70 state contractor or prospective state contractor who has managerial or
71 discretionary responsibilities with respect to a state contract, (v) the
72 spouse or a dependent child who is eighteen years of age or older of an
73 individual described in this subparagraph, or (vi) a political committee
74 established or controlled by an individual described in this
75 subparagraph or the business entity or nonprofit organization that is the
76 state contractor or prospective state contractor.
77 (G) "Dependent child" means a child residing in an individual's
78 household who may legally be claimed as a dependent on the federal
sHB5546 / File No. 551 3

sHB5546 File No. 551
79 income tax return of such individual.
80 (H) "Managerial or discretionary responsibilities with respect to a
81 state contract" means having direct, extensive and substantive
82 responsibilities with respect to the negotiation of the state contract and
83 not peripheral, clerical or ministerial responsibilities.
84 (I) "Rendition of services" means the provision of any service to a state
85 agency or quasi-public agency in exchange for a fee, remuneration or
86 compensation of any kind from the state or through an arrangement
87 with the state.
88 (J) "State contract solicitation" means a request by a state agency or
89 quasi-public agency, in whatever form issued, including, but not limited
90 to, an invitation to bid, request for proposals, request for information or
91 request for quotes, inviting bids, quotes or other types of submittals,
92 through a competitive procurement process or another process
93 authorized by law waiving competitive procurement.
94 (K) "Subcontractor" means any person, business entity or nonprofit
95 organization that contracts to perform part or all of the obligations of a
96 state contractor's state contract. Such person, business entity or
97 nonprofit organization shall be deemed to be a subcontractor until
98 December thirty-first of the year in which the subcontract terminates.
99 "Subcontractor" does not include (i) a municipality, [or] any other
100 political subdivision of the state or any indigenous tribe of the state
101 recognized under subsection (b) of section 47-59a, including any entities
102 or associations duly created by the municipality, [or] political
103 subdivision or indigenous tribe exclusively amongst themselves to
104 further any purpose authorized by statute, [or] charter or tribal law, or
105 (ii) an employee in the executive or legislative branch of state
106 government or a quasi-public agency, whether in the classified or
107 unclassified service and full or part-time, and only in such person's
108 capacity as a state or quasi-public agency employee.
109 (L) "Principal of a subcontractor" means (i) any individual who is a
110 member of the board of directors of, or has an ownership interest of five
sHB5546 / File No. 551 4

sHB5546 File No. 551
111 per cent or more in, a subcontractor, which is a business entity, except
112 for an individual who is a member of the board of directors of a
113 nonprofit organization, (ii) an individual who is employed by a
114 subcontractor, which is a business entity, as president, treasurer or
115 executive vice president, (iii) an individual who is the chief executive
116 officer of a subcontractor, which is not a business entity, or if a
117 subcontractor has no such officer, then the officer who duly possesses
118 comparable powers and duties, (iv) an officer or an employee of any
119 subcontractor who has managerial or discretionary responsibilities with
120 respect to a subcontract with a state contractor, (v) the spouse or a
121 dependent child who is eighteen years of age or older of an individual
122 described in this subparagraph, or (vi) a political committee established
123 or controlled by an individual described in this subparagraph or the
124 business entity or nonprofit organization that is the subcontractor.
125 (2) (A) No state contractor, prospective state contractor, principal of
126 a state contractor or principal of a prospective state contractor, with
127 regard to a state contract or a state contract solicitation with or from a
128 state agency in the executive branch or a quasi-public agency or a
129 holder, or principal of a holder, of a valid prequalification certificate,
130 shall make a contribution to, or, on and after January 1, 2011, knowingly
131 solicit contributions from the state contractor's or prospective state
132 contractor's employees or from a subcontractor or principals of the
133 subcontractor on behalf of (i) an exploratory committee or candidate
134 committee established by a candidate for nomination or election to the
135 office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State
136 Comptroller, Secretary of the State or State Treasurer, (ii) a political
137 committee authorized to make contributions or expenditures to or for
138 the benefit of such candidates, or (iii) a party committee;
139 (B) No state contractor, prospective state contractor, principal of a
140 state contractor or principal of a prospective state contractor, with
141 regard to a state contract or a state contract solicitation with or from the
142 General Assembly or a holder, or principal of a holder, of a valid
143 prequalification certificate, shall make a contribution to, or, on and after
144 January 1, 2011, knowingly solicit contributions from the state
sHB5546 / File No. 551 5

sHB5546 File No. 551
145 contractor's or prospective state contractor's employees or from a
146 subcontractor or principals of the subcontractor on behalf of (i) an
147 exploratory committee or candidate committee established by a
148 candidate for nomination or election to the office of state senator or state
149 representative, (ii) a political committee authorized to make
150 contributions or expenditures to or for the benefit of such candidates, or
151 (iii) a party committee;
152 (C) If a state contractor or principal of a state contractor makes or
153 solicits a contribution as prohibited under subparagraph (A) or (B) of
154 this subdivision, as determined by the State Elections Enforcement
155 Commission, the contracting state agency or quasi-public agency may,
156 in the case of a state contract executed on or after February 8, 2007, void
157 the existing contract with such contractor, and no state agency or quasi-
158 public agency shall award the state contractor a state contract or an
159 extension or an amendment to a state contract for one year after the
160 election for which such contribution is made or solicited unless the
161 commission determines that mitigating circumstances exist concerning
162 such violation. No violation of the prohibitions contained in
163 subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision shall be deemed to have
164 occurred if, and only if, the improper contribution is returned to the
165 principal by the later of thirty days after receipt of such contribution by
166 the recipient committee treasurer or the filing date that corresponds
167 with the reporting period in which such contribution was made;
168 (D) If a prospective state contractor or principal of a prospective state
169 contractor makes or solicits a contribution as prohibited under
170 subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision, as determined by the State
171 Elections Enforcement Commission, no state agency or quasi-public
172 agency shall award the prospective state contractor the contract
173 described in the state contract solicitation or any other state contract for
174 one year after the election for which such contribution is made or
175 solicited unless the commission determines that mitigating
176 circumstances exist concerning such violation. The Commissioner of
177 Administrative Services shall notify applicants of the provisions of this
178 subparagraph and subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision during
sHB5546 / File No. 551 6

sHB5546 File No. 551
179 the prequalification application process;
180 (E) The State Elections Enforcement Commission shall make
181 available to each state agency and quasi-public agency a written notice
182 advising state contractors and prospective state contractors of the
183 contribution and solicitation prohibitions contained in subparagraphs
184 (A) and (B) of this subdivision. Such notice shall: (i) Direct each state
185 contractor and prospective state contractor to inform each individual
186 described in subparagraph (F) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, with
187 regard to such state contractor or prospective state contractor, about the
188 provisions of subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision, whichever is
189 applicable, and this subparagraph; (ii) inform each state contractor and
190 prospective state contractor of the civil and criminal penalties that could
191 be imposed for violations of such prohibitions if any such contribution
192 is made or solicited; (iii) inform each state contractor and prospective
193 state contractor that, in the case of a state contractor, if any such
194 contribution is made or solicited, the contract may be voided; (iv) inform
195 each state contractor and prospective state contractor that, in the case of
196 a prospective state contractor, if any such contribution is made or
197 solicited, the contract described in the state contract solicitation shall not
198 be awarded, unless the commission determines that mitigating
199 circumstances exist concerning such violation; and (v) inform each state
200 contractor and prospective state contractor that the state will not award
201 any other state contract to anyone found in violation of such
202 prohibitions for a period of one year after the election for which such
203 contribution is made or solicited, unless the commission determines that
204 mitigating circumstances exist concerning such violation. Each state
205 agency and quasi-public agency shall include in the bid specifications
206 or request for proposals for a state contract, a copy of or Internet link to
207 such notice. No state agency or quasi-public agency shall execute a state
208 contract unless such contract contains a representation that the chief
209 executive officer or authorized signatory of the contract has received
210 such notice; and
211 (F) (i) Any principal of the state contractor or prospective state
212 contractor submitting a bid or proposal for a state contract shall certify
sHB5546 / File No. 551 7

sHB5546 File No. 551
213 that neither the contractor or prospective state contractor, nor any of its
214 principals, have made any contributions to, or solicited any
215 contributions on behalf of, any party committee, exploratory committee,
216 candidate for state-wide office or for the General Assembly, or political
217 committee authorized to make contributions to or expenditures to or for,
218 the benefit of such candidates, in the previous four years, that were
219 determined by the State Elections Enforcement Commission to be in
220 violation of subparagraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision, without
221 mitigating circumstances having been found to exist concerning such
222 violation. Each such certification shall be sworn as true to the best
223 knowledge and belief of the person signing the certification, subject to
224 the penalties of false statement. If there is any change in the information
225 contained in the most recently filed certification, such person shall
226 submit an updated certification not later than thirty days after the
227 effective date of any such change or upon the submittal of any new bid
228 or proposal for a state contract, whichever is earlier.
229 (ii) Each state agency and quasi-public agency shall include in the bid
230 specifications or request for proposals for a state contract a notice of the
231 certification requirements of this subparagraph. No state agency or
232 quasi-public agency shall execute a state contract unless the state agency
233 or quasi-public agency obtains the written certification described in this
234 subparagraph.
235 (iii) Any principal of the state contractor or prospective state
236 contractor submitting a bid or proposal for a state contract shall disclose
237 on the certification all contributions made by any of its principals to any
238 party committee, exploratory committee, candidate for state-wide office
239 or for the General Assembly, or political committee authorized to make
240 contributions to or expenditures to or for the benefit of such candidates
241 for a period of four years prior to the signing of the contract or date of
242 the response to the bid, whichever is longer, and certify that all such
243 contributions have been disclosed.
244 (3) (A) On and after December 31, 2006, neither the Governor,
245 Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State Comptroller, Secretary of
sHB5546 / File No. 551 8

sHB5546 File No. 551
246 the State or State Treasurer, any candidate for any such office nor any
247 agent of any such official or candidate shall knowingly, wilfully or
248 intentionally solicit contributions on behalf of an exploratory committee
249 or candidate committee established by a candidate for nomination or
250 election to any public office, a political committee or a party committee,
251 from a person who he or she knows is prohibited from making
252 contributions, including a principal of a state contractor or prospective
253 state contractor with regard to a state contract solicitation with or from
254 a state agency in the executive branch or a quasi-public agency or a
255 holder of a valid prequalification certificate.
256 (B) On and after December 31, 2006, neither a member of the General
257 Assembly, any candidate for any such office nor any agent of any such
258 official or candidate shall knowingly, wilfully or intentionally solicit
259 contributions on behalf of an exploratory committee or candidate
260 committee established by a candidate for nomination or election to any
261 public office, a political committee or a party committee, from a person
262 who he or she knows is prohibited from making contributions,
263 including a principal of a state contractor or prospective state contractor
264 with regard to a state contract solicitation with or from the General
265 Assembly or a holder of a valid prequalification certificate.
266 (4) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the campaign
267 of a principal of a state contractor or prospective state contractor or to a
268 principal of a state contractor or prospective state contractor who is an
269 elected public official.
270 (5) Each state contractor and prospective state contractor shall make
271 reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of this subsection. If
272 the State Elections Enforcement Commission determines that a state
273 contractor or prospective state contractor has failed to make reasonable
274 efforts to comply with this subsection, the commission may impose civil
275 penalties against such state contractor or prospective state contractor in
276 accordance with subsection (a) of section 9-7b.
277 Sec. 2. Section 9-601 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
278 amended by adding subdivision (39) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
sHB5546 / File No. 551 9

sHB5546 File No. 551
279 (NEW) (39) "Personal security services" means services rendered to a
280 candidate by one or more individuals, other than on-duty law
281 enforcement personnel, for the personal security of such candidate, such
282 candidate's family or such candidate's campaign staff, which services
283 are necessary as a direct result of campaign activity that would not exist
284 but for such candidate's campaign.
285 Sec. 3. Subsection (e) of section 9-706 of the 2026 supplement to the
286 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
287 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
288 (e) (1) The State Elections Enforcement Commission shall (A) adopt
289 regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, on
290 permissible expenditures under subsection (g) of section 9-607, as
291 amended by this act, for qualified candidate committees receiving
292 grants from the fund under sections 9-700 to 9-716, inclusive, [and] (B)
293 on or after July 1, 2021, amend such regulations to permit expenditures
294 for child care services, and (C) on or after July 1, 2026, amend such
295 regulations to permit expenditures for personal security services, which
296 regulations so amended pursuant to this subparagraph shall allow
297 payment for the rendering of such services until the certification of the
298 results of the applicable primary or election.
299 (2) After the amendment of regulations pursuant to [subparagraph
300 (B)] subparagraphs (B) and (C) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
301 expenditures for child care services and personal security services made
302 by the qualified candidate committee of a participating candidate shall
303 be deemed permissible if such expenditures (A) are, in the aggregate,
304 not more than the amount of qualifying contributions permitted under
305 section 9-704, and (B) comply with all regulations adopted or amended,
306 as applicable, pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
307 Sec. 4. Subsection (c) of section 9-710 of the general statutes is
308 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
309 2026):
310 (c) A candidate who intends to participate in the Citizens' Election
sHB5546 / File No. 551 10

sHB5546 File No. 551
311 Program may provide personal funds for such candidate's campaign for
312 nomination or election in an amount not exceeding: (1) For a candidate
313 for the office of Governor, twenty thousand dollars; (2) for a candidate
314 for the office of Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State
315 Comptroller, State Treasurer or Secretary of the State, ten thousand
316 dollars; (3) for a candidate for the office of state senator, two thousand
317 dollars; or (4) for a candidate for the office of state representative, one
318 thousand dollars. Such personal funds shall not constitute a qualifying
319 contribution under section 9-704. For the purposes of this section, and
320 after the amendment of regulations pursuant to [subparagraph (B)]
321 subparagraphs (B) and (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of section
322 9-706, as amended by this act, expenditures for child care services or
323 personal security services made directly from any such candidate's
324 personal funds and for which such candidate does not seek
325 reimbursement from his or her candidate committee, as provided in
326 subsection (k) of section 9-607, shall not count toward the amounts
327 provided in subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive, as applicable, of this
328 subsection.
329 Sec. 5. Subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of section 9-607 of the general
330 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
331 (Effective July 1, 2026):
332 (2) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, any treasurer, in
333 accomplishing the lawful purposes of the committee, may pay the
334 expenses of: (A) Advertising in electronic and print media; (B) any other
335 form of printed advertising or communications including "thank you"
336 advertising after the election; (C) campaign items, including, but not
337 limited to, brochures, leaflets, flyers, invitations, stationery, envelopes,
338 reply cards, return envelopes, campaign business cards, direct mailings,
339 postcards, palm cards, "thank you" notes, sample ballots and other
340 similar items; (D) political banners and billboards; (E) political
341 paraphernalia, which is customarily given or sold to supporters
342 including, but not limited to, campaign buttons, stickers, pins, pencils,
343 pens, matchbooks, balloons, pads, calendars, magnets, key chains, hats,
344 tee shirts, sweatshirts, frisbees, pot holders, jar openers and other
sHB5546 / File No. 551 11

sHB5546 File No. 551
345 similar items; (F) purchasing office supplies for campaign or political
346 purposes, campaign photographs, raffle or other fund-raising permits
347 required by law, fund-raiser prizes, postage, express mail delivery
348 services, bulk mail permits, and computer supplies and services; (G)
349 banking service charges to maintain campaign and political accounts;
350 (H) subscriptions to newspapers and periodicals which enhance the
351 candidacy of the candidate or party; (I) lease or rental of office space for
352 campaign or political purposes and expenses in connection therewith
353 including, but not limited to, furniture, parking, storage space, utilities
354 and maintenance, provided a party committee or political committee
355 organized for ongoing political activities may purchase such office
356 space; (J) lease or rental of vehicles for campaign use only; (K) lease,
357 rental or use charges of any ordinary and necessary campaign office
358 equipment including, but not limited to, copy machines, telephones,
359 postage meters, facsimile machines, computer hardware, software and
360 printers, provided a party committee or political committee organized
361 for ongoing political activities may purchase office equipment, and
362 provided further that a candidate committee or a political committee,
363 other than a political committee formed for ongoing political activities
364 or an exploratory committee, may purchase computer equipment; (L)
365 compensation for campaign or committee staff, fringe benefits [,] and
366 payroll taxes, [and child care services, provided (i)] provided the
367 candidate and any member of his immediate family shall not receive
368 compensation; [, and (ii) compensation for child care services is
369 reasonable and customary for the services rendered;] (M) travel, meals
370 and lodging expenses of speakers, campaign or committee workers, the
371 candidate and the candidate's spouse for political and campaign
372 purposes; (N) fund raising; (O) reimbursements to candidates and
373 campaign or committee workers made in accordance with the
374 provisions of this section for campaign-related expenses for which a
375 receipt is received by the treasurer; (P) campaign or committee services
376 of attorneys, accountants, consultants or other professional persons for
377 campaign activities, obtaining or contesting ballot status, nomination,
378 or election, and compliance with this chapter; (Q) purchasing campaign
379 finance reports; (R) repaying permissible campaign loans made to the
sHB5546 / File No. 551 12

sHB5546 File No. 551
380 committee that are properly reported and refunding contributions
381 received from an impermissible source or in excess of the limitations set
382 forth in this chapter; (S) conducting polls concerning any political party,
383 issue, candidate or individual; (T) gifts to campaign or committee
384 workers or purchasing flowers or other commemorative items for
385 political purposes not to exceed one hundred dollars to any one
386 recipient in a calendar year or for the campaign, as the case may be; (U)
387 purchasing tickets or advertising from charities, inaugural committees,
388 or other civic organizations if for a political purpose, for any candidate,
389 a candidate's spouse, a member of a candidate's campaign staff, or
390 members of committees; (V) the inauguration of an elected candidate by
391 that candidate's candidate committee; (W) hiring of halls, rooms, music
392 and other entertainment for political meetings and events; (X)
393 reasonable compensation for public speakers hired by the committee;
394 (Y) transporting electors to the polls and other get-out-the-vote activities
395 on election day; [and] (Z) child care services and personal security
396 services, provided the amount paid for such services is reasonable and
397 customary for the services rendered; and (AA) any other necessary
398 campaign or political expense.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 9-612(f)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 9-601(39)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 9-706(e)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 9-710(c)
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 9-607(g)(2)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 5(2)(Z), "or" was changed to "and" and "the amount for such
services" was changed to "the amount paid for such services" for clarity.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5546 / File No. 551 13

sHB5546 File No. 551
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands existing exemptions from certain definitions under
state campaign finance law to statutorily recognized indigenous tribes
and designates security as an allowable expenditure under the Citizens'
Election Program (CEP), resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or
municipalities. There is no impact because most CEP grants are fully
spent1.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
1 The Citizens' Election Fund received $79,712 in refunds from CEP candidates in 2024.
sHB5546 / File No. 551 14

sHB5546 File No. 551
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5546
AN ACT CONCERNING CAMPAIGN FINANCE LAWS,
STATUTORILY RECOGNIZED INDIGENOUS TRIBES AND
SECURITY FOR CANDIDATES, THEIR FAMILIES AND THEIR
CAMPAIGN STAFFS.